Hawaii statutes.
§21-7 Hearings. (a) An investigating
committee may hold hearings appropriate for the performance of its duties, at
such times and places as the committee determines.

(b) The committee shall provide by its rules
that each member of the committee be given at least three days written notice
of any hearing to be held when the legislature is in session and at least seven
days written notice of any hearing to be held when the legislature is not in
session. The notices shall include a statement of the subject matter of the
hearing. A hearing, and any action taken at a hearing, shall not be deemed
invalid solely because notice of the hearing was not given in accordance with
this requirement.

(c) Any investigating committee shall not
conduct a hearing unless a quorum is present. [L 1969, c 211, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next